Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1024.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-101. Definitions In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Alcohol" means any substance containing any form of alcohol, including ethanol, methanol, propynol and isopropynol. 2. "Alcohol concentration" if expressed as a percentage means either: (a) The number of grams of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of blood. (b) The number of grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of breath. 3. "All-terrain vehicle" means either of the following: (a) A motor vehicle that satisfies all of the following: (i) Is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel. (ii) Is fifty or fewer inches in width. (iii) Has an unladen weight of one thousand two hundred pounds or less. (iv) Travels on three or more nonhighway tires. (v) Is operated on a public highway. (b) A recreational off-highway vehicle that satisfies all of the following: (i) Is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel. (ii) Is eighty or fewer inches in width. (iii) Has an unladen weight of two thousand five hundred pounds or less. (iv) Travels on four or more nonhighway tires. (v) Has a steering wheel for steering control. (vi) Has a rollover protective structure. (vii) Has an occupant retention system. 4. "Authorized emergency vehicle" means any of the following: (a) A fire department vehicle. (b) A police vehicle. (c) An ambulance or emergency vehicle of a municipal department or public service corporation that is designated or authorized by the department or a local authority. (d) Any other ambulance, fire truck or rescue vehicle that is authorized by the department in its sole discretion and that meets liability insurance requirements prescribed by the department. 5. "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle on which the driver and passengers ride in a fully or partially enclosed seating area that is equipped with a roll cage, safety belts for each occupant and antilock brakes and that is designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and pedals. 6. "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain. 7. "Automotive recycler" means a person that is engaged in the business of buying or acquiring a motor vehicle solely for the purpose of dismantling, selling or otherwise disposing of the parts or accessories and that removes parts for resale from six or more vehicles in a calendar year. 8. "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is equipped with an automated driving system. 9. "Aviation fuel" means all flammable liquids composed of a mixture of selected hydrocarbons expressly manufactured and blended for the purpose of effectively and efficiently operating an internal combustion engine for use in an aircraft but does not include fuel for jet or turbine powered aircraft. 10. "Bicycle" means a device, including a racing wheelchair, that is propelled by human power and on which a person may ride and that has either: (a) Two tandem wheels, either of which is more than sixteen inches in diameter. (b) Three wheels in contact with the ground, any of which is more than sixteen inches in diameter. 11. "Board" means the transportation board. 12. "Bus" means a motor vehicle designed for carrying sixteen or more passengers, including the driver. 13. "Business district" means the territory contiguous to and including a highway if there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes within any six hundred feet along the highway, including hotels, banks or office buildings, railroad stations and public buildings that occupy at least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet collectively on both sides of the highway. 14. "Certificate of ownership" means a paper or an electronic record that is issued in another state or a foreign jurisdiction and that indicates ownership of a vehicle. 15. "Certificate of title" means a paper document or an electronic record that is issued by the department and that indicates ownership of a vehicle. 16. "Combination of vehicles" means a truck or truck tractor and semitrailer and any trailer that it tows but does not include a forklift designed for the purpose of loading or unloading the truck, trailer or semitrailer. 17. "Controlled substance" means a substance so classified under section 102(6) of the controlled substances act (21 United States Code section 802(6)) and includes all substances listed in schedules I through V of 21 Code of Federal Regulations part 1308. 18. "Conviction" means: (a) An unvacated adjudication of guilt or a determination that a person violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or by an authorized administrative tribunal. (b) An unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person's appearance in court. (c) A plea of guilty or no contest accepted by the court. (d) The payment of a fine or court costs. 19. "County highway" means a public road that is constructed and maintained by a county. 20. "Dealer" means a person who is engaged in the business of buying, selling or exchanging motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers and who has an established place of business and has paid fees pursuant to section 28-4302. 21. "Department" means the department of transportation acting directly or through its duly authorized officers and agents. 22. "Digital network or software application" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 23. "Director" means the director of the department of transportation. 24. "Drive" means to operate or be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle. 25. "Driver" means a person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle. 26. "Driver license" means a license that is issued by a state to an individual and that authorizes the individual to drive a motor vehicle. 27. "Dynamic driving task": (a) Means all of the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic. (b) Includes: (i) Lateral vehicle motion control by steering. (ii) Longitudinal motion control by acceleration and deceleration. (iii) Monitoring the driving environment by object and event detection, recognition, classification and response preparation. (iv) Object and event response execution. (v) Maneuver planning. (vi) Enhancing conspicuity by lighting, signaling and gesturing. (c) Does not include strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selecting destinations and waypoints. 28. "Electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts and that meets the requirements of one of the following classes: (a) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (b) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that may be used exclusively to propel the bicycle or tricycle and that is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (c) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle or tricycle that is equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and that ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle or tricycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour. 29. "Electric miniature scooter" means a device that: (a) Weighs less than thirty pounds. (b) Has two or three wheels. (c) Has handlebars. (d) Has a floorboard on which a person may stand while riding. (e) Is powered by an electric motor or human power, or both. (f) Has a maximum speed that does not exceed ten miles per hour, with or without human propulsion, on a paved level surface. 30. "Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a self-balancing device with one wheel or two nontandem wheels and an electric propulsion system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen miles per hour or less and that is designed to transport only one person. 31. "Electric standup scooter": (a) Means a device that: (i) Weighs less than seventy-five pounds. (ii) Has two or three wheels. (iii) Has handlebars. (iv) Has a floorboard on which a person may stand while riding. (v) Is powered by an electric motor or human power, or both. (vi) Has a maximum speed that does not exceed twenty miles per hour, with or without human propulsion, on a paved level surface. (b) Does not include an electric miniature scooter. 32. "Evidence" includes both of the following: (a) A display on a wireless communication device of a department-generated driver license, nonoperating identification license, vehicle registration card or other official record of the department that is presented to a law enforcement officer or in a court or an administrative proceeding. (b) An electronic or digital license plate authorized pursuant to section 28-364. 33. "Farm" means any lands primarily used for agriculture production. 34. "Farm tractor" means a motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing implements of husbandry. 35. "Foreign vehicle" means a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer that is brought into this state other than in the ordinary course of business by or through a manufacturer or dealer and that has not been registered in this state. 36. "Fully autonomous vehicle" means an autonomous vehicle that is equipped with an automated driving system designed to function as a level four or five system under SAE J3016 and that may be designed to function either: (a) Solely by use of the automated driving system. (b) By a human driver when the automated driving system is not engaged. 37. "Golf cart" means a motor vehicle that has not less than three wheels in contact with the ground, that has an unladen weight of less than one thousand eight hundred pounds, that is designed to be and is operated at not more than twenty-five miles per hour and that is designed to carry not more than four persons including the driver. 38. "Gross combined weight rating" means the sum of the gross vehicle weight rating of a motor vehicle and the trailer or semitrailer the motor vehicle tows. 39. "Gross vehicle weight rating" means the weight that is assigned by the motor vehicle manufacturer to a motor vehicle and that represents the maximum recommended total weight, including the vehicle and the load for the vehicle. 40. "Hazardous material" means a material, and its mixtures or solutions, that the United States department of transportation determines under 49 Code of Federal Regulations is, or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin under 42 Code of Federal Regulations part 73 that is, capable of posing an unreasonable risk to health, safety and property if transported in commerce and that is required to be placarded or marked as required by the department's safety rules prescribed pursuant to chapter 14 of this title. 41. "Human driver" means a natural person in the vehicle who performs in real time all or part of the dynamic driving task or who achieves a minimal risk condition for the vehicle. 42. "Implement of husbandry" means a vehicle that is designed primarily for agricultural purposes and that is used exclusively in the conduct of agricultural operations, including an implement or vehicle that uses an automated driving system or that is autonomous or that is self-propelled or otherwise, whether operated manually, equipped with an automated driving system that is not in use or equipped with an automated driving system that is in use, and that meets both of the following conditions: (a) Is used solely for agricultural purposes, including the preparation or harvesting of cotton, alfalfa, grains, specialty crops and other farm crops. For the purposes of this subdivision, "specialty crops" includes fruits, vegetables, tree nuts, dried fruits and horticulture and nursery crops, including floriculture. (b) Is only incidentally operated or moved on a highway whether as a trailer or an autonomous vehicle or a self-propelled unit. For the purposes of this subdivision, "incidentally operated or moved on a highway" means travel between a farm and another part of the same farm, from one farm to another farm or between a farm and a place of repair, supply or storage. 43. "Limousine" means a motor vehicle providing prearranged ground transportation service for an individual passenger, or a group of passengers, that is arranged in advance or is operated on a regular route or between specified points and includes ground transportation under a contract or agreement for services that includes a fixed rate or time and is provided in a motor vehicle with a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers including the driver. 44. "Livery vehicle" means a motor vehicle that: (a) Has a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers including the driver. (b) Provides passenger services for a fare determined by a flat rate or flat hourly rate between geographic zones or within a geographic area. (c) Is available for hire on an exclusive or shared ride basis. (d) May do any of the following: (i) Operate on a regular route or between specified places. (ii) Offer prearranged ground transportation service as defined in section 28-141. (iii) Offer on demand ground transportation service pursuant to a contract with a public airport, licensed business entity or organization. 45. "Local authority" means any county, municipal or other local board or body exercising jurisdiction over highways under the constitution and laws of this state. 46. "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the business of manufacturing motor vehicles, trailers or semitrailers. 47. "Minimal risk condition": (a) Means a condition to which a human driver or an automated driving system may bring a vehicle in order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or should not be completed. (b) Includes bringing the vehicle to a complete stop. 48. "Moped" means a bicycle, not including an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter or an electric standup scooter, that is equipped with a helper motor if the vehicle has a maximum piston displacement of fifty cubic centimeters or less, a brake horsepower of one and one-half or less and a maximum speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less on a flat surface with less than a one percent grade. 49. "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle that has a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and that is designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground but excludes a tractor, an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter, an electric standup scooter and a moped. 50. "Motor driven cycle" means a motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a motor that produces not more than five horsepower but does not include an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter or an electric standup scooter. 51. "Motorized quadricycle" means a self-propelled motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (a) The vehicle is self-propelled by an emission-free electric motor and may include pedals operated by the passengers. (b) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (c) The vehicle seats at least eight passengers, including the driver. (d) The vehicle is operable on a flat surface using solely the electric motor without assistance from the pedals or passengers. (e) The vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 28-5201. (f) The vehicle is a limousine operating under a vehicle for hire company permit issued pursuant to section 28-9503. (g) The vehicle is manufactured by a motor vehicle manufacturer that is licensed pursuant to chapter 10 of this title. (h) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. 52. "Motor vehicle": (a) Means either: (i) A self-propelled vehicle. (ii) For the purposes of the laws relating to the imposition of a tax on motor vehicle fuel, a vehicle that is operated on the highways of this state and that is propelled by the use of motor vehicle fuel. (b) Does not include a scrap vehicle, a personal delivery device, a personal mobile cargo carrying device, a motorized wheelchair, an electric personal assistive mobility device, an electric bicycle, an electric miniature scooter, an electric standup scooter or a motorized skateboard. For the purposes of this subdivision: (i) "Motorized skateboard" means a self-propelled device that does not have handlebars and that has a motor, a deck on which a person may ride and at least two tandem wheels in contact with the ground. (ii) "Motorized wheelchair" means a self-propelled wheelchair that is used by a person for mobility. 53. "Motor vehicle fuel" includes all products that are commonly or commercially known or sold as gasoline, including casinghead gasoline, natural gasoline and all flammable liquids, and that are composed of a mixture of selected hydrocarbons expressly manufactured and blended for the purpose of effectively and efficiently operating internal combustion engines. Motor vehicle fuel does not include inflammable liquids that are specifically manufactured for racing motor vehicles and that are distributed for and used by racing motor vehicles at a racetrack, use fuel as defined in section 28-5601, aviation fuel, fuel for jet or turbine powered aircraft or the mixture created at the interface of two different substances being transported through a pipeline, commonly known as transmix. 54. "Neighborhood electric shuttle": (a) Means a self-propelled electrically powered motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (i) The vehicle is emission free. (ii) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (iii) The vehicle is capable of transporting at least eight passengers, including the driver. (iv) The vehicle is a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 28-5201. (v) The vehicle is a vehicle for hire as defined in section 28-9501 and operates under a vehicle for hire company permit issued pursuant to section 28-9503. (vi) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. (b) Includes a vehicle that meets the standards prescribed in subdivision (a) of this paragraph and that has been modified after market and not by the manufacturer to transport up to fifteen passengers, including the driver. 55. "Neighborhood electric vehicle" means a self-propelled electrically powered motor vehicle to which all of the following apply: (a) The vehicle is emission free. (b) The vehicle has at least four wheels in contact with the ground. (c) The vehicle complies with the definition and standards for low-speed vehicles, unless excepted or exempted under federal law, set forth in 49 Code of Federal Regulations sections 571.3(b) and 571.500, respectively. 56. "Neighborhood occupantless electric vehicle" means a neighborhood electric vehicle that is not designed, intended or marketed for human occupancy. 57. "N-number license marking" means a license number marking that is assigned by the federal aviation administration to identify roadable aircraft. 57. 58. "Nonresident" means a person who is not a resident of this state as defined in section 28-2001. 58. 59. "Off-road recreational motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is designed primarily for recreational nonhighway all-terrain travel and that is not operated on a public highway. Off-road recreational motor vehicle does not mean a motor vehicle used for construction, building trade, mining or agricultural purposes. 59. 60. "Operational design domain": (a) Means operating conditions under which a given automated driving system is specifically designed to function. (b) Includes roadway types, speed range, environmental conditions, such as weather or time of day, and other domain constraints. 60. 61. "Operator" means a person who drives a motor vehicle on a highway, who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway or who is exercising control over or steering a vehicle being towed by a motor vehicle. 61. 62. "Owner" means: (a) A person who holds the legal title of a vehicle. (b) If a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease with the right of purchase on performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, the conditional vendee or lessee. (c) If a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession of the vehicle, the mortgagor. 62. 63. "Pedestrian" means any person afoot. A person who uses an electric personal assistive mobility device or a manual or motorized wheelchair is considered a pedestrian unless the manual wheelchair qualifies as a bicycle. For the purposes of this paragraph, "motorized wheelchair" means a self-propelled wheelchair that is used by a person for mobility. 63. 64. "Personal delivery device": (a) Means a device that is both of the following: (i) Manufactured for transporting cargo and goods in an area described in section 28-1225. (ii) Equipped with automated driving technology, including software and hardware, that enables the operation of the device with the remote support and supervision of a human. (b) Does not include a personal mobile cargo carrying device. 64. 65. "Personal mobile cargo carrying device" means an electronically powered device that: (a) Is operated primarily on sidewalks and within crosswalks and that is designed to transport property. (b) Weighs less than eighty pounds, excluding cargo. (c) Operates at a maximum speed of twelve miles per hour. (d) Is equipped with technology to transport personal property with the active monitoring of a property owner and that is primarily designed to remain within twenty-five feet of the property owner. (e) Is equipped with a braking system that when active or engaged enables the personal mobile cargo carrying device to come to a controlled stop. 65. 66. "Power sweeper" means an implement, with or without motive power, that is only incidentally operated or moved on a street or highway and that is designed for the removal of debris, dirt, gravel, litter or sand whether by broom, vacuum or regenerative air system from asphaltic concrete or cement concrete surfaces, including parking lots, highways, streets and warehouses, and a vehicle on which the implement is permanently mounted. 66. 67. "Public transit" means the transportation of passengers on scheduled routes by means of a conveyance on an individual passenger fare-paying basis excluding transportation by a sightseeing bus, school bus or taxi or a vehicle not operated on a scheduled route basis. 67. 68. "Reconstructed vehicle" means a vehicle that has been assembled or constructed largely by means of essential parts, new or used, derived from vehicles or makes of vehicles of various names, models and types or that, if originally otherwise constructed, has been materially altered by the removal of essential parts or by the addition or substitution of essential parts, new or used, derived from other vehicles or makes of vehicles. For the purposes of this paragraph, "essential parts" means integral and body parts, the removal, alteration or substitution of which will tend to conceal the identity or substantially alter the appearance of the vehicle. 68. 69. "Residence district" means the territory contiguous to and including a highway not comprising a business district if the property on the highway for a distance of three hundred feet or more is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business. 69. 70. "Right-of-way" when used within the context of the regulation of the movement of traffic on a highway means the privilege of the immediate use of the highway. Right-of-way when used within the context of the real property on which transportation facilities and appurtenances to the facilities are constructed or maintained means the lands or interest in lands within the right-of-way boundaries. 71. "Roadable aircraft" means an aircraft that has a mode of transportation that enables the aircraft to operate like a vehicle under this title and that is manufactured to meet the federal safety standards for motorcycles. 70. 72. "SAE J3016" means surface transportation recommended practice J3016 taxonomy and definitions for terms related to driving automation systems for on-road motor vehicles published by SAE international in June 2018. 71. 73. "School bus" means a motor vehicle that is designed for carrying more than ten passengers and that is either: (a) Owned by any public or governmental agency or other institution and operated for the transportation of children to or from home or school on a regularly scheduled basis. (b) Privately owned and operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from home or school on a regularly scheduled basis. 72. 74. "Scrap metal dealer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1641. 73. 75. "Scrap vehicle" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1641. 74. 76. "Semitrailer" means a vehicle that is with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer or single-axle tow dolly, that is designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and that is constructed so that some part of its weight and that of its load rests on or is carried by another vehicle. For the purposes of this paragraph, "pole trailer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. 75. 77. "Single-axle tow dolly" means a nonvehicle device that is drawn by a motor vehicle, that is designed and used exclusively to transport another motor vehicle and on which the front or rear wheels of the drawn motor vehicle are mounted on the tow dolly while the other wheels of the drawn motor vehicle remain in contact with the ground. 76. 78. "State" means a state of the United States and the District of Columbia. 77. 79. "State highway" means a state route or portion of a state route that is accepted and designated by the board as a state highway and that is maintained by the state. 78. 80. "State route" means a right-of-way whether actually used as a highway or not that is designated by the board as a location for the construction of a state highway. 79. 81. "Street" or "highway" means the entire width between the boundary lines of every way if a part of the way is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel. 80. 82. "Taxi" means a motor vehicle that has a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen passengers, including the driver, that provides passenger services and that: (a) Does not primarily operate on a regular route or between specified places. (b) Offers local transportation for a fare determined on the basis of the distance traveled or prearranged ground transportation service as defined in section 28-141 for a predetermined fare. 81. 83. "Title transfer form" means a paper or an electronic form that is prescribed by the department for the purpose of transferring a certificate of title from one owner to another owner. 82. 84. "Traffic survival school" means a school that is licensed pursuant to chapter 8, article 7.1 of this title and that offers educational sessions that are designed to improve the safety and habits of drivers and that are approved by the department. 83. 85. "Trailer" means a vehicle that is with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer or single-axle tow dolly, that is designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and that is constructed so that no part of its weight rests on the towing vehicle. A semitrailer equipped with an auxiliary front axle commonly known as a dolly is deemed to be a trailer. For the purposes of this paragraph, "pole trailer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. 84. 86. "Transportation network company" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 85. 87. "Transportation network company vehicle" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 86. 88. "Transportation network service" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-9551. 87. 89. "Truck" means a motor vehicle designed or used primarily for the carrying of property other than the effects of the driver or passengers and includes a motor vehicle to which has been added a box, a platform or other equipment for such carrying. 88. 90. "Truck tractor" means a motor vehicle that is designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and that is not constructed to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load drawn. 89. 91. "Vehicle": (a) Means a device in, on or by which a person or property is or may be transported or drawn on a public highway. (b) Does not include: (i) Electric bicycles, electric miniature scooters, electric standup scooters and devices moved by human power. (ii) Devices used exclusively on stationary rails or tracks. (iii) Personal delivery devices. (iv) Scrap vehicles. (v) Personal mobile cargo carrying devices. 90. 92. "Vehicle transporter" means either: (a) A truck tractor capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer. (b) A truck tractor with a stinger-steered fifth wheel capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer or a truck tractor with a dolly mounted fifth wheel that is securely fastened to the truck tractor at two or more points and that is capable of carrying a load and drawing a semitrailer. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-2157, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-2157. Application for registration; exception A. A person shall apply to the department for registration of a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer on forms prescribed or authorized by the department. B. The application shall contain: 1. The name and complete residence address of the owner. 2. A description of the vehicle, including the serial number. 3. If it is a new vehicle, the date of sale by the manufacturer or dealer to the person first operating the vehicle. 4. If the owner of the vehicle rents or intends to rent the vehicle without a driver, a statement of that fact. 5. Other facts required by the department. C. The registering officer shall indicate on the face of the registration application that the registrant may be subject to vehicle emissions testing requirements pursuant to section 49-542. D. On request of an applicant, the department shall allow the applicant to provide on the registration of a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer a post office box address that is regularly used by the applicant and that is located in the county in which the applicant resides. E. The person shall include with the application the required fees and the certificate of title to the vehicle for which registration is sought. The registering officer may waive the requirement that the applicant present a certificate of title at the time of making an application for renewal if the registering officer has available complete and sufficient records to accurately compute the vehicle license tax. F. The department may request an applicant who appears in person to register a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer to satisfactorily complete the vision screening test prescribed by the department. G. A person applying for initial registration of a neighborhood electric vehicle, a neighborhood electric shuttle or a motorized quadricycle shall certify in writing that a notice of the operational restrictions applying to the vehicle as provided in section 28-966 are contained on a permanent notice attached to or painted on the vehicle in a location that is in clear view of the driver.  This subsection does not apply to a fully autonomous vehicle that is incapable of operation by a human driver. H. When registering a roadable aircraft, the department shall record the N-number license marking of the roadable aircraft and, as best as practicable, combine the title and registration processes for vehicles as prescribed in this title with the registration process for aircraft as prescribed in this title. The renewal date for both registrations is the renewal date prescribed by section 28-8322, subsection B. I. A roadable aircraft must maintain both aircraft registration and vehicle registration except if the roadable aircraft is subject to an annual license tax pursuant to section 28-8337, 28-8338 or 28-8341, the vehicle registration for the roadable aircraft is cancelled. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 28, chapter 7, article 11, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 28-2357, to read: START_STATUTE28-2357. Roadable aircraft license plates When issuing a license plate for a roadable aircraft, the department shall issue a motorcycle-sized license plate. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 28-3101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3101. Driver license classes A. Except as provided in subsections B and C of this section and section 28-3102, the following driver license classes are valid: 1. Class A. A class A license is valid for operating either of the following: (a) A motor vehicle that tows a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than ten thousand pounds if the gross combined weight rating is twenty-six thousand one or more pounds. (b) A vehicle that requires a class B, C or D license. 2. Class B. A class B license is valid for operating any of the following: (a) A single motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one or more pounds. (b) A motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one or more pounds that tows a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or less. (c) A vehicle that requires a class C or D license for operation. 3. Class C. A class C license is valid for operating any of the following: (a) A single motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less. (b) A motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less that tows a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or less. (c) A motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less that tows a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than ten thousand pounds, if the gross combined weight rating is less than twenty-six thousand one pounds. (d) A vehicle that is required to be placarded for hazardous materials. (e) A bus or school bus. (f) A vehicle that requires a class D license for operation. 4. Class D. A class D license is valid for operating any of the following: (a) A single motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less, including an autocycle and a roadable aircraft. (b) A motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less that tows a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or less. (c) A motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less that tows a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than ten thousand pounds if the gross combined weight rating is less than twenty-six thousand one pounds. (d) A motorized touring vehicle. For the purposes of this subdivision, "motorized touring vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is all of the following: (i) Owned by a commercial entity. (ii) Rented for use during a sightseeing tour that is guided by an employee of the commercial entity that rents the motor vehicle. (iii) Designed to travel with three wheels on the ground. (iv) Capable of a maximum speed of forty-five miles per hour. 5. Class G. A class G license is valid for operating a single motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less. 6. Class M. A class M license is valid for operating a motorcycle, motor driven cycle or moped but is not necessary for operating an autocycle, a roadable aircraft or a motorcycle that has at least three wheels and a three-point safety belt and bucket or bench seats and that is fully enclosed or uses a roll cage frame.  For the purpose of licensing a driver, the department may endorse a class M license classification on a valid class A, B, C, D or G license. B. A class A, B, C, D or G license is not valid for operating a vehicle that requires a class M license or a vehicle that requires a special endorsement unless the proper endorsement appears on the license. C. A commercial driver license is not required to operate a vehicle described in subsection A, paragraph 1, 2 or 3 of this section if the vehicle has been issued a historic vehicle license plate pursuant to section 28-2484 and the department provides in the vehicle registration record both of the following: 1. That the vehicle is classified as a noncommercial vehicle and may not be used as a commercial vehicle. 2. The vehicle's declared gross weight as defined in section 28-5431 is entered as zero. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Effective date This act is effective from and after December 31, 2026.